Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202048-818.02
School district, educational service
unit, or community college; total compensation; considerations.

When determining
total compensation pursuant to subsection (1) of section 48-818 for a school
district, educational service unit, or community college with their certificated
and instructional employees, the commission shall consider the employer's
contribution to retirement plans and health insurance premiums, premium equivalent
payments, or cash equivalent payments and any other costs, including Federal
Insurance Contributions Act contributions, associated with providing such
benefits.

Laws 2011, LB397, § 12.